Arkansas, session 2025, HB1819.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-18-203(b), concerning the State
Registrar of Vital Records, is amended to add an additional subdivision to
read as follows:
(6) The state registrar shall coordinate with the University of
Arkansas for Medical Sciences to contact mothers of infants registering for a
certificate of birth in this state to provide the mothers with support and
assistance during the postpartum period.




*JMB230*
03/17/2025 8:47:15 AM JMB230